Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.050

Firefighters' pension fund—How constituted.

There is hereby created and established in the treasury of each municipality a fund which shall be known and designated as the firefighters' pension fund, which shall consist of: (1) All bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or paid thereto; (2) twenty-five percent of all moneys received by the state from taxes on fire insurance premiums; (3) taxes paid pursuant to the provisions of RCW 41.16.060; (4) interest on the investments of the fund; and (5) contributions by firefighters as provided for herein. The moneys received from the tax on fire insurance premiums under the provisions of this chapter shall be distributed in the proportion that the number of paid firefighters in the city, town, or fire protection district bears to the total number of paid firefighters throughout the state to be ascertained in the following manner: The secretary of the firefighters' pension board of each city, town, and fire protection district now or hereafter coming under the provisions of this chapter shall within thirty days after June 7, 1961, and on or before the fifteenth day of January thereafter, certify to the state treasurer the number of paid firefighters in the fire department in such city, town, or fire protection district. For any city or town annexed by a fire protection district at any time before, on, or after June 9, 1994, the city or town shall continue to certify to the state treasurer the number of paid firefighters in the city or town fire department immediately before annexation until all obligations against the firefighters' pension fund in the city or town have been satisfied. For the purposes of the calculation in this section, the state treasurer shall subtract the number certified by the annexed city or town from the number of paid firefighters certified by an annexing fire protection district. The state treasurer shall on or before the first day of June of each year deliver to the treasurer of each city, town, and fire protection district coming under the provisions of this chapter his or her warrant, payable to each city, town, or fire protection district for the amount due such city, town or fire protection district ascertained as herein provided and the treasurer of each such city, town, or fire protection district shall place the amount thereof to the credit of the firefighters' pension fund of such city, town, or fire protection district.

[ 2007 c 218 s 22; 1999 c 117 s 3; 1994 c 273 s 23; 1986 c 296 s 3; 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 16; 1967 c 42 s 1; 1961 c 255 s 8; 1949 c 45 s 1; 1947 c 91 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9578-44. Prior: 1929 c 86 s 11; 1919 c 196 s 14.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Severability—Effective date—1986 c 296: See notes following RCW 48.14.020.

Severability—Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 35: See notes following RCW 82.08.020.

Insurance premiums taxes: RCW 48.14.020.